dictsource/sv_rules
// Swedish translation rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded

.group a
        a          A:
    ik) a          %a
        a (CC      a
        a (vs      A:
        a (vb      A:
        a (vd      A:
        a (va      a
        a (rt_     A:
     _) a (rt      %a
        a (vg      A:
        a (r_      a
        a (s_      a
     p) a (d_      a
     k) a (k       A:
    kl) a (r       A:
   ikl) a (r_      a
 xempl) a (r       A:
    sv) a (r       A:
    sv) a (rt      a
     b) a (k       A:
    bl) a (d       A:
    gl) a (d       A:
    gl) a (d%      a
     b) a (kte     a
     k) a (s_      a
     k) a (ni      a
     _k) a (@   a
     b) a (r_      A:
    lt) a (t       A:
    _b) a (k       A:
    bb) a (r_      a
        a (C%      a
//      r) a (C%    a
        a (_       a
        a (re      a
        a (rn      A:
        a (rna     a
     l) a (rs      A:
   idr) a          A:
     k) a (ta      %a
     m) a (j       a
    om) a (t       A:
     m) a (ter     a
    st) a (rt      A:
    gr) a (m       a
        a (x       a
     p) a (nel     a
        a (uto     a
     k) a (n       a
     n) a (d       a
     j) a (n       a
        a (de      a
    eg) a (n       a
    er) a (d       a
  form) a (ti      a
    er) a (t       a
     d) a (n       a
    st) a (t_      a
   tot) a (l       'A:
   _gl) a (s       A:
    gl) a (s%      a
     v) a (ld      A:
     v) a (rd      A:
    sm) a (rt      A:
     r) a (t       A:
     s) a (maC     a
    ng) a (d       a
     m) a (n       a
//     t) a (t	 A:
   ent) a (r       A:
        a (t_      a
        ast        ast
     s) a (s       a
     s) a (d       a
    er) a (t       a
    åg) a (n       a
     t) a (n       a
    el) a (d       a
    nn) a (n       a
  mell) a (n       a
   _sk) a (d       A:
  ansv) a (r       A:
    ll) a (de      a
    _v) a (nl      A:
     d) a (d       a
   ppd) a (t       a
     r) a (ba      a
   ass) a          a
     l) a (g       A:
     l) a (gg      a
     d) a (g       A:
     d) a (g%      a
    ik) a (ns      'A:
     t) a (g       A:
     t) a (g%      a
     f) a (rt      'A:
     f) a (rl      'A:
     f) a (ren     A:
     n) a (ti      %a
     s) a (ti      %a
     t) a (ti      %a
    ks) a (m       a
    ts) a (m       a
//    tt) a (C    a
     n) a (l_      'A:
    tt) a (ga      A:
    tt) a (get     A:
    tt) a (git     A:

     &) a          a
    dd) a (C       a

    dr) a (t       a
    dr) a (d       a
    nd) a (r       a
   str) a          a
   edr) a (r       A:
     s) a (kn      A:
     s) a (ks      A:
     s) a (ke      A:
     t) a (ls      A:
    at) a          a
    ep) a (r       %a
        arbet      aRbe:t
        amerik     amERIk
        agera      age:Ra
    pl) a (nera    %a
        analy      analy:
     _) avta       A:vtA:
     _) avge       A:vj'e:
     v) a (lf      A:
  delt) a          A:
   ret) a (g       A:
   edr) a (g       A:
    sk) a (da      A:
    sk) a (de      A:
    sk) a (p       A:
     t) a (lC      A:
     t) a (l%      a
     v) a (ria     a
     b) a (r       A:
     t) a (l_      'A:
     t) a (l_      'A:
     b) a (r%      a
        a (bo      a
        alkohol    alkUho:l
        allvar     allvA:R
    ch) au (CC o:
     _) au (C	    O
     @) ans (_      'ans
      b) a          a
    

.group b
        b          b
        b (b 
        bevakn     bEvA:kn
        bredband   bRe:dband
        begrav     bEgRA:v
        begrip     bEgR'i:p
        beslag     bEsl'A:g
        beslagta   bEsl'A:gtA:
        betal      b%Et'A:l


.group c
        c          k
        cc         ks
        cc (A      ks        // ??
        c (e       s
        c (i       s
        c (y       s
        c (ä       s
        c (ö       s
        ch         S
        ch (ef     sx
        ck         k
        ck (A      k:        // ??
        computer   _^_EN
        click      _^_EN

.group d
        d          d
        d (d 
        dj         j
        dagen      dA:gEn
        daglig     dA:glIg
        diske      dIskE
        dju        j'u-
        djung      j'8N
        dum        d8m
        datorer    dat'u:RER
        dator      dA:tOR
        data       dA:ta
        databas    dA:tabA:s
        drogen     dRo:gEn
        droger     dRo:gER
        design     _^_EN
        download   _^_EN


.group e
        e          e:
     h) e (m       E
        e (CC      E
     &) e          %E
   med) e (l       E

        e (j       E
     d) e (lv      e:
     d) e (c       E
     d) e (ls      e:
     m) e (dde     e:
     d) e (ln      e:
     d) e (lt      e:
     l) e (dn      e:
     d) e (bat     E
    ch) e (f       E:
        e (ta      E
        e (x       E
     &) e (_       %E
     &) es (_      %Es
     &) en (_      %En
     &) ens (_     %Ens
     &) er (_      %ER
     &) et (_S2    %Et       // ??
        e (ve      E
     t) e (lef     E
     h) et (_      e:t
     m) e (ny      E
     n) e (ds      e:
    br) e (v       e:
    sv) e (r       E
     s) e (p       %E
    ka) e (l       E
     b) e (l_      E
   nyh) e (t       e:
     r) e (sul     E
     r) e (sur     E
     r) e (dak     E
     b) e (f       %E
     b) e (g       %E
     b) e (k       %E
     b) e (h       %E
     b) e (s       %E
     b) e (v       %E
     b) e (l       %E
     b) e (t       %E
     b) e (r       %E
     r) e (g       %E
     s) e (k       %E
     v) e (ta      e:
     r) e (ta      e:
     r) e (dn      e:
     l) e (ta      e:
        e (nli     e:
        e (gent    E
    pr) e (n       %E
    mp) e (l       %E
    pr) e (c       %E
    sp) e (c       %E
     g) e (n       %E
     _) e (tik     E
     r) e (ce      E
     m) e (tod     E
     p) e (ri      E
   xtr) e (m       e:
     v) e (k       e:
    it) e (t_      e:
    st) e (mC      'e:
     s) e (ra      e:
     r) e (ra      e:
     n) e (ra      e:
     f) e (ra      e:
     g) e (ra      e:
     m) e (ra      e:
     d) e (ra      e:
     l) e (ra      e:
     t) e (ra      e:
     m) e (del     e:
     d) e (lse     %E
     g) e (nom     e:
  liot) e (k       e:
     c) e (r       e:
     l) e (da      e:
    gh) e (t       e:
     h) e (ten     e:
    st) e (k       e:
   yst) e (m       e:
    it) e (t       e:
    _h) e (ta      e:
        ember      'EmbER
        e (rsä     e:
        e (rsatt   e:
        e (nbar    e:
        e (rin     e:
     p) e (da      E
     r) e (tur     %E
        e (xemp    %E
        elek       'ElEk
        espeak     _^_EN
        ekonom     'Eku:n,O:m
    er) ens        'ans
  över) ens        'Ens
        esent      Es'Ent
        enhet      e:nhe:t

.group f
        f          f
        f (f 
        familj     fam'Ilj
        formad     fORmad
        face       _^_EN
        fn (_      mn
     _) fj (ärd    fj
     _) fj (ärr    fj
     _) fj (äll    fj

.group g
        g          g
        gg         g
        g (e       j
        g (i       j
    or) g (ar      j
    or) g (en      j
        g (y       j
        g (ä       j
        g (ö       j
     i) g (t_      
        g (t       k
        gn         Nn
     _) gn         gn
        gj         j
    lä) g (e       g
    vä) g          g
    lo) g (i       g
     y) g (e       g
     y) g (a       g
     y) g (o       g
     a) g (e       g
     i) g (i       g
     a) g (i       g
   sla) g          g
        gjor       ju:R
        gani       gan'I
        garage     gaR'A:S
        garant     g%aR'ant
        gata       gA:ta
        glöm       glWm
        guid (e    g'ajd
        group      _^_EN

.group h
        h          h
        h (h 
        hj         j
        hjälp      jElp
        hög        hY:g
        heading    _^_EN
   _) hon (P3      ho:N

.group i
        i          i:
        i (CC      I
        i (nf      %I
        i (g_      I
    k) i (g	    I	
        i (nstr    %I
     s) i (t       I
    dr) i (v       i:
         i (n_	    'i:
	 i (ner  'i:
	 i (nen 'i:

        item       _^_EN
   _fl) i (k       i:
     t) i (d       i:
   skr) i (v       i:
     v) i (sn      i:
     l) i (kna     i:
     l) i (c       I
     d) i (r       I
     t) i (s       I
     c) i          I
     c) i (s_      i:
    Cl) i (kaC     %I
    kr) i (ti      I
    kr) i (te      I
    kr) i (s       i:
    kr) i (st      i:
  krit) i (k_      i:
        ikon       Ik'o:n
        ibili      IbIlI
// AEGIS
        itut(_       Itu-t
        imag       _^_EN

.group j
        j          j

        java       jA:va
        j (uster   sx
        jou (r     sxU

.group k
        k          k

//        kk       k
//        kk (A    k:  // double k not used
//        k ( er   k
//        k ( en   k
        kj         S;
     _) k (e       S;
     _) k (iC%     k
     _) k (i       S;
     _) k (y       S;
     _) k (ä       S;
        k (änd     S;
        k (änt     S;
        k (änn     S;
     _) k (ö       S;
        k (öp      S;
        karta      kA:Rta
        kategori   katEg,u:Ri:
        kalend     kal'End
        kommun     kOm'u-n
        kommunika  kOm8nIka
        kontor     kOnt'u:R
        känsl      S;Ensl

.group l
        l          l
        l (l 
        lg (_      lj
     _) lj         j
        låg        l'o:g
        lju        j'u-
        ligen      lIgEn
        lager      lA:gER

.group m
        m          m
        m (m 
        menu       _^_EN
        människ    m'EnIsx,
        medl       m'e:dl
        maga       maga
        meny       mEn'y:
        minimera   mIni:m'e:Ra
        maria      m%aR'i:a
        marie      m%aR'i:
        maximera   maksi:m'e:Ra
        motor      m'u:tOR
        motorer    m'Otu:RER
        model      mOd'El
        musik      mu-s'i:k
        medvet     me:dv'e:t
        masken     maskEn
        maskera    maske:Ra
        mjuk       mju-k
        masker     maskER
        medborg    me:dbORj
        mobil      mObi:l
        modem      mOde:m

.group n
        n          n
        n (n 
        ng         N
    fu) ng (er     ng
        n (k       N
        network    _^_EN
        normal     nORmA:l
        natur      n'at'u-R
        nali       nalI
        navig      n%av%Ig

.group o
        o          u:

//sort
        o (C%      U
        o (CC      O
    pr) o (b       %O
        o (bb      O
    pr) o (c       %U
    pr) o (cent    %O
        och        'Ok
     s) o (ci      %U
        o (ck      O
     g) o (d       u:
     k) o (d       o:
    bl) o (d       'u:
    pr) o (d       %O
        o (dd      O
        o (ff      O
     l) o (g       'o:
    kr) o (g       u:
     l) o (gg      'O
     _) o (j       O
    pr) oj         Osx'
     b) o (k       u:
     d) o (k       O
     k) o (k       'u:
     l) o (k       %U
    kr) o (k       u:
     p) o (lis     %O
        o (ll      O
     k) o (lu      %O
        o (m_      O
        o (mm      O
     d) o (n       O
     f) o (n       'o:
     g) o (n       O
     l) o (n       O
    kr) o (n       u:
    rtr) o (n	     O
    ng) o (n	     O
    ll)   o (n	     O
    ss) o (n       O
        o (ni      'o:
        o (ns      U
     k) o (ns      O
    nn) o (ns      O
        operat     OpERat
     k) o (pi      'O
        o (pp      O
     p) o (pu      O
     g) o (r       U
     s) o (r       'O
    lk) o (r       o:
        o (rC      u:
     n) o (r_      O
     s) o (r_      O
     t) o (r_      O
    rs) o (rd      u:
        o (rde     o:
        o (rg      O
        o (rk      O
     f) o (rm      'O
    st) o (rm      O
    n) o (rm       'O
   inf) o (rmati   %O
        o (rr      O
     C) o (rs      O
     b) o (rt      O
     k) o (rt      O
    pp) o (rt      O
    sp) o (rt      O
   upp) o (rt      o:
     k) o (rv      O
        osparat    u:spA:Rat
        o (ss      O
     b) o (st      u:
     m) o (t       'u:
     f) o (tb      u:
        o (tt      O
     l) o (v       'o:
    pr) o (v       u:
     n) o (vell    %O
     b) o (x       'O
//endsort
